District of Columbia statutes.
16-3901

Practice; applicability of other laws and rules of court.

All provisions of law relating to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and the rules of the court apply to the Small Claims and Conciliation Branch of the court as far as they may be applicable and are not in conflict with this chapter or Chapter 13 of Title 11. In case of conflict, this chapter and chapter 13 of Title 11 control.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 608, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(p)(2)
1973 Ed., § 16-3901.
1981 Ed., § 16-3901.